Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1629.01
District health department; county board; levy; limitation.

The county boards of the counties which have established a district health department may levy and collect an annual tax of not to exceed eight-tenths of one cent on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such county as may be necessary to meet the expenditures of such district health department in proportion to which the population of such county bears to the entire population of such district subject to section 77-3443.

Laws 1943, c. 152, § 4, p. 556;

R.S.1943, § 71-1629;

Laws 1949, c. 206, § 2(2), p. 593;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 69, p. 970;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 185;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 159;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 39;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 63.